Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1755.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-97 of Title 2, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, any label
approved by the United States Environmental Protection Agency shall
be sufficient to satisfy any requirements for a warning regarding
health or safety under Oklahoma state law, including without
limitation, the duty to warn, or any other common law duty to warn.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-13005 JL 02/27/25

Req. No. 13005 Page 1